District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.02

Reciprocal agreements.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the Mayor is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of the District of Columbia with duly authorized representatives of any jurisdiction of the United States or a foreign country, providing for the registration of vehicles on an apportionment or allocation basis. In the exercise of this authority, the Mayor is expressly authorized to enter into and become a member of the IRP, or such other designation that may, from time to time, be given to such a plan.

(b)

The IRP and any other agreements that this subchapter authorizes the Mayor to enter into shall take precedence over any District of Columbia law or regulation that may be in conflict with these agreements.

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 3, 44 DCR 3620
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1507.01.
1981 Ed., § 40-122.